Arkansas, session 2025, SB292.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 6-14-102(a)(1)(A), concerning the date of
the annual school election, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1)(A) The annual school election shall be held in each school
district of the state:
(i) In even-numbered years, on the date of the:
(a) Preferential primary election; or
(b) General election; and
(ii)(a) In Except as provided in subdivision
(a)(1)(A)(ii)(b) of this section, in odd-numbered years, on the:
(a)(1) Second Tuesday in November; or
(b)(2) Second Tuesday in May.
*SSS137*
02/25/2025 8:55:39 AM SSS137

SB292
(b) An annual school election that is
scheduled to occur in a month in which the second Tuesday of the month under
subdivision (a)(1)(A)(ii)(a) of this section falls on a state holiday shall
be held on the third Tuesday of that month.

SECTION 2. EMERGENCY CLAUSE. It is found and determined by the
General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that ensuring adequate
participation in elections preserves the public peace, health, and safety as
it ensures that the results of elections fairly reflect the will of voters;
that the holding of elections on a state holiday prevents many voters from
participating in an election and could potentially lead to election results
that do not reflect the overall will of voters; and that this act preserves
the public peace, health, and safety by ensuring that the annual school
election will not occur on a state holiday to allow appropriate participation
in the election to ensure fair and accurate results. Therefore, an emergency
is declared to exist, and this act being immediately necessary for the
preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective
on:
(1) The date of its approval by the Governor;
(2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor,
the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the
bill; or
(3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is
overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.












02/25/2025 8:55:39 AM SSS137